Idaho statutes. Title 60 PUBLIC PRINTING AND OFFICIAL NOTICES
Chapter 2
STATE PUBLICATIONS

Sec.

§ 60-201. Limitations on publications.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to constitutional officers, the state colleges and universities, or the legislative and judicial branches of government.

§ 60-202. Required information.

The following information shall be included adjacent to the identification of the agency responsible for the publication: date, publication identification or sequence number, and program code of the program responsible for the publication. This information is to be placed and printed in an appropriate manner so as to be easily discernible and readable.

For the purpose of cost accounting and review, any state agency program expending funds for publishing materials shall maintain, for audit purposes, records containing the total cost of printing each publication, whether by the state or on bid, the number printed, the intended audience and a justification.

§ 60-203. Prohibited publications.

No state agency shall print or cause to be printed any document intended for use to urge any elector to vote for or against any candidate or proposition on an election ballot or to lobby for or against any proposition or matter having the effect of law being considered by the legislature or any local governing authority. This provision shall not prevent the normal dissemination of factual information relative to a proposition on any election ballot or a proposition or matter having the effect of law being considered by the legislature or any local governing authority.